Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5895.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 12722. (1) If the owner of a private drinking water well notifies the department that PFAS was detected in the owner's private drinking water well and the amount of PFAS detected is above EPA or state maximum contaminant levels, not later than 30 days after the department is notified, the department shall provide a notice that contains, at a minimum, all of the following information to the owner of the private drinking water well that notified the department under this subsection: (a) Advice on the household use of water, including instructions that may reduce the threat posed by PFAS in the water. (b) Information on how to obtain a free PFAS NSF certified water filter from a local health department. (c) Other educational materials on PFAS, including potential health risks and how an owner may obtain additional testing. (2) In addition to the notice requirement under subsection (1), the department shall provide a notice that contains, at a minimum, all of the following information to any owner of real property within a 1-mile radius of a private drinking water well where PFAS was detected under subsection (1): (a) A statement that a private drinking water well located within a 1-mile radius of the owner's real property was tested for PFAS. (b) A statement that the amount of PFAS detected is above EPA or state maximum contaminant levels. (c) Advice on the household use of water, including instructions that may reduce the threat posed by PFAS in the water. (d) Information on how an owner may obtain testing for the owner's private drinking water well, and how to notify the department if testing detects an amount of PFAS above EPA or state maximum contaminant levels. (e) Other educational materials on PFAS, including potential health risks. (3) If the department through its own investigation detects PFAS in a monitoring well or drinking water well, and the amount of PFAS detected is above EPA or state maximum contaminant levels, not later than 30 days after the PFAS is detected, the department shall provide a notice that contains all of the information described under subsection (1) to any owner of real property within a 1-mile radius of the location where the department detected the presence of PFAS. (4) As used in this section and sections 12723 to 12724: (a) "Department" means the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (b) "EPA" means the United States Environmental Protection Agency. (c) "Local health department" means that term as defined in section 1105. (d) "PFAS" means a perfluoroalkyl or polyfluoroalkyl substance that includes any member of the class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least 1 fully fluorinated carbon atom. Sec. 12723. A local health department shall provide a free PFAS NFS certified water filter to any owner of a private drinking water well in which PFAS was detected under section 12722. To obtain a free PFAS NFS certified water filter under this section, the owner shall provide a copy of a notice received under section 12722. Sec. 12724. The department shall create a voluntary registry of individuals who are required to be notified when testing occurs under section 12722(3). The individuals included in the voluntary registry must be notified via an email that contains all of the following information: (a) The location of the testing. (b) The date the testing occurred. (c) The reason for the testing.